California statutes. Education Code
(1) Since its adoption in 1960, the Master Plan for Higher Education has served to create the largest and most distinguished higher education system in the nation. A key component of the Master Plan for Higher Education is the differentiation of mission and function, whereby doctoral and identified professional programs are limited to the University of California, with the provision that the California State University can provide doctoral education in joint doctoral programs with the University of California and independent California colleges and universities. The differentiation of function has
 allowed California to provide universal access to postsecondary education while preserving quality.

(2) Because of the need to prepare and educate increased numbers of audiologists, the State of California is granting the California State University authority to offer the Doctor of Audiology degree as an exception to the differentiation of function in graduate education that assigns sole authority among the California higher education segments to the University of California for awarding doctoral degrees independently. This exception to the Master Plan for Higher Education recognizes the distinctive strengths and respective missions of the California State University and the University of California.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (a), and notwithstanding Section 66010.4,
 in order to meet specific audiology education needs in California, the California State University may award the Doctor of Audiology (Au.D.) degree. The authority to award degrees granted by this article is limited to the discipline of audiology. The Au.D. degree offered by the California State University shall be distinguished from doctoral degree programs at the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 267, Sec. 1.   (AB 2317)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

66041.1.

In implementing Section 66041, the California State University shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(a) Enrollments in these programs shall not diminish enrollment growth
 in university undergraduate programs.

(b) The Doctor of Audiology (Au.D.) degree offered by the California State University shall be focused on preparing audiologists to provide health care services and shall be consistent with the standards for accreditation set forth by the Council on Academic Accreditation in Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology.

(c) Each student in the programs authorized by this article shall be charged fees no higher than the rate charged for students in state-supported doctoral degree programs in audiology at the University of California, including joint Au.D. programs of the California State University and the University of California.

(d) The California State University shall provide any startup
 and operation funding needed for the programs authorized by this article from within existing budgets for academic programs support, without diminishing the quality of program support offered to California State University undergraduate programs. Funding of these programs shall not result in reduced undergraduate enrollments at the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 267, Sec. 1.   (AB 2317)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.7. Doctoral Programs in Physical Therapy [66042. - 66042.3.]

66042.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) Since its adoption in 1960, the Master Plan for Higher Education has served to create the largest and most distinguished higher education system in the nation. A key component of the Master Plan for Higher Education is the differentiation of mission and function, whereby doctoral and identified professional programs are limited to the University of California, with the provision that the California State University can provide doctoral education in joint doctoral programs with the University of California and independent California colleges and universities. The
 differentiation of function has allowed California to provide universal access to postsecondary education while preserving quality.

(2) Because of the need to prepare and educate increased numbers of physical therapists, the State of California is granting the California State University authority to offer the Doctor of Physical Therapy degree as an exception to the differentiation of function in graduate education that assigns sole authority among the California higher education segments to the University of California for awarding doctoral degrees independently. This exception to the Master Plan for Higher Education recognizes the distinctive strengths and respective missions of the California State University and the University of California.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (a), and notwithstanding Section 66010.4, in
 order to meet specific physical therapy education needs in California, the California State University may award the Doctor of Physical Therapy (D.P.T.) degree. The authority to award degrees granted by this article is limited to the discipline of physical therapy. The Doctor of Physical Therapy degree offered by the California State University shall be distinguished from doctoral degree programs at the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 425, Sec. 1.   (AB 2382)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

66042.1.

In implementing Section 66042, the California State University shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(a) Funding on a per full-time equivalent student (FTES) basis for each new student in these degree programs shall be from within the California State University’s enrollment growth levels as agreed to in the annual Budget Act. Enrollments in these programs shall not alter the California State University’s ratio of graduate instruction to total enrollment, and shall not diminish enrollment growth in university undergraduate programs. Funding provided from the state for each FTES shall be at the agreed-upon marginal cost calculation that the California State University receives.

(b) The Doctor of Physical Therapy (D.P.T.) degree offered by the California State University shall be focused on preparing physical therapists to provide health care services, and shall be consistent with meeting the requirements of the Commission on Accreditation in Physical Therapy Education (CAPTE).

(c) Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit or preclude the California Postsecondary Education Commission from exercising its authority under Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 66900) to review, evaluate, and make recommendations relating to any and all programs established under this article.

(d) Each student in the programs authorized by this article shall be charged fees no higher than the rate charged for students in state-supported doctoral degree programs in physical therapy at the University of
 California, including joint D.P.T. programs of the California State University and the University of California.

(e) The California State University shall provide any startup funding needed for the programs authorized by this article from within existing budgets for academic programs support, without diminishing the quality of program support offered to California State University undergraduate programs. Funding of these programs shall not result in reduced undergraduate enrollments at the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 425, Sec. 1.   (AB 2382)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

66042.3.

(a) The California State University, the Department of Finance, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall jointly conduct a statewide evaluation of the new programs implemented under this article. The results of the evaluation shall be reported, in writing, to the Legislature and the Governor on or before January 1, 2015. The evaluation required by this section shall consider all of the following:

(1) The number of new doctoral programs in physical therapy implemented, including information identifying the number of new programs, applicants, admissions, enrollments, and degree recipients.

(2) The extent to which the programs established under this article are fulfilling identified needs for physical therapists, including statewide supply and demand data that considers capacity at the University of California and in California’s independent colleges and universities.

(3) Information on the place of employment of students and the subsequent job placement of graduates.

(4) Program costs and the fund sources that were used to finance these programs, including a calculation of cost per degree awarded.

(5) The costs of the programs to students, the amount of financial aid offered, and student debt levels of graduates of the programs.

(6) The extent to which the programs established under this article are in compliance with the requirements of this article.

(b) (1) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 425, Sec. 1.   (AB 2382)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.8. Doctor of Occupational Therapy Program [66043. - 66043.1.]

66043.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) Since its adoption in 1960, the Master Plan for Higher Education has served to create the largest and most distinguished higher education system in the nation. A key component of the Master Plan for Higher Education is the differentiation of mission and function, whereby doctoral and identified professional programs are limited to the University of California, with the provision that the California State University can provide doctoral education in joint doctoral programs with the University of California and independent California colleges and universities. The differentiation of function has allowed California to provide universal access to postsecondary education while
 preserving quality.

(2) Because of the need to prepare and educate increased numbers of occupational therapists, the state is granting the California State University authority to offer the Occupational Therapy Doctorate degree as an exception to the differentiation of function in graduate education that assigns sole authority among the California higher education segments to the University of California for awarding doctoral degrees independently. This exception to the Master Plan for Higher Education recognizes the distinctive strengths and respective missions of the California State University and the University of California.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (a), and notwithstanding Section 66010.4, in order to meet specific occupational therapy education needs in the state, the California State University may establish Occupational Therapy Doctorate degree programs.

(c) The authority to establish degree programs granted by this article shall be limited to the discipline of occupational therapy.

(d) The Occupational Therapy Doctorate degree programs offered by the California State University shall be distinguished from doctoral degree programs at the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 183, Sec. 1.   (AB 829)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

66043.1.

(a) The Occupational Therapy Doctorate degree programs offered by the California State University shall be focused on preparing occupational therapists to provide health care services and shall be consistent with the standards for accreditation set forth by the appropriate accrediting body.

(b) The California State University shall provide any startup and operation funding needed for the degree programs authorized by this article from within existing budgets for academic program support, without diminishing the quality of program support offered to California State University undergraduate programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 183, Sec. 1.   (AB 829)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.9. Doctoral Programs in Public Health [66044. - 66044.1.]

66044.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Since its adoption in 1960, the Master Plan for Higher Education has served to create the largest and most distinguished higher education system in the nation. A key component of the Master Plan for Higher Education is the differentiation of mission and function of each public higher education sector to increase access and educational opportunity for Californians. The Master Plan has a provision that allows the California State University to offer doctoral education in joint doctoral programs with the University of California and independent California colleges and universities.

(2) More recently, the California State University has received legislative authority to offer independent professional doctoral degrees in areas where there is an identified workforce or accreditation need that may not be fulfilled through existing education opportunities in California.

(3) Because of the need to prepare and educate increased numbers of public health leaders and administrators, the State of California is granting the California State University authority to offer the Doctor of Public Health (DrPH) degree as an exception to the differentiation of function in graduate education that assigns sole authority among the California higher education segments to the University of California for awarding doctoral degrees independently. This exception to the Master Plan for
 Higher Education recognizes the distinctive strengths and respective missions of the California State University and the University of California.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (a), and notwithstanding Section 66010.4, in order to meet specific public health leadership needs in California, the California State University may award the Doctor of Public Health (DrPH) degree. The authority to award degrees granted by this article is limited to the discipline of public health. The Doctor of Public Health (DrPH) degree offered by the California State University shall be distinguished from doctoral degree programs in public health at the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 936, Sec. 1.   (SB 684)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

66044.1.

In implementing Section 66044, the California State University shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(a) Enrollments in the Doctor of Public Health (DrPH) degree programs offered by the California State University pursuant to this article shall not diminish enrollment growth in university undergraduate programs.

(b) The degree programs authorized by this article shall be focused on health and scientific knowledge translation and transformative community leadership, and shall be designed to address the community public health workforce needs of California and prepare qualified professionals to be leaders and
 experienced practitioners who apply their advanced knowledge in service to
 California’s diverse communities in areas such as community health administration, health education and promotion, and public health advocacy. These degree programs shall enable professionals to earn the degree while working full time.

(c) Each student in the degree programs authorized by this article shall be charged fees comparable to, but not higher than, those fees charged for the Doctor of Public Health (DrPH) degree at the University of California.

(d) The California State University shall provide any startup and operation funding needed for the degree programs authorized by
 this article from within existing budgets for academic program support without diminishing the quality of program support offered to California State University undergraduate programs. Funding of these degree programs shall not result in reduced undergraduate enrollment at the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 936, Sec. 1.   (SB 684)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.92. Doctoral Programs [66046. - 66046.3.]

66046.

As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Chancellor” means the Chancellor of the CSU.

(b) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the chancellor.

(c) “CSU” means the California State University.

(d) “President” means the President of the UC.

(e) “President’s office” means the office of the president.

(f) “Proposed doctoral program” means a proposed doctoral degree program at the CSU pursuant to this article.

(g) “Trustees” means the Trustees of the CSU.

(h) “UC” means the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 663, Sec. 1.   (AB 656)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

66046.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Since its adoption in 1960, the Master Plan for Higher Education has served to create the largest and most distinguished higher education system in the nation. A key component of the Master Plan for Higher Education is the differentiation of mission and function of each public higher education sector to increase access and educational opportunity for Californians. The Master Plan has a provision that allows the CSU to offer doctoral education in joint doctoral programs with the UC and independent California colleges and universities.

(2) More recently, the CSU has received legislative authority to offer independent professional or applied doctoral degrees in areas where there is an identified workforce or accreditation need that may not be fulfilled through existing education opportunities in California.

(3) The State of California is granting the CSU authority to offer professional or applied doctoral degrees statewide that do not duplicate UC doctoral degrees as an exception to the differentiation of function in graduate education that assigns sole authority among the California higher education segments to UC for awarding doctoral degrees independently. This exception
 to the Master Plan for Higher Education recognizes the distinctive strengths and respective missions of the CSU and the UC.

(b) Consistent with subdivision (a), and notwithstanding Section 66010.4, the CSU, in consultation with the president’s office, may award professional or applied doctoral degrees statewide that do not duplicate UC doctoral degrees. In implementing this article, the CSU shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) Enrollment in CSU professional or applied doctoral degree programs established pursuant to this article shall not diminish enrollment in CSU undergraduate
 programs.

(2) CSU
 professional or applied doctoral degree programs established pursuant to this article shall not duplicate UC doctoral degree programs that are offered or under review by the UC. A professional or applied doctoral degree program established pursuant to this article shall be distinguished from doctoral degree programs offered by the UC.

(3) The CSU shall establish fees for professional or applied doctoral degree programs established pursuant to this article that
 shall be comparable to, but no higher than, those fees charged for UC doctoral degree programs.

(4) The CSU shall provide any startup and operational funding needed for professional or applied doctoral degree programs established pursuant to this article from within existing budgets for academic program support without diminishing the quality of program support offered for CSU undergraduate programs. Funding of professional or applied doctoral degree programs established pursuant to this article shall not result in reduced CSU undergraduate enrollment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 663, Sec. 1.   (AB 656)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

66046.2

A professional or applied doctoral degree program established pursuant to this article shall comply with all of the following limitations:

(a) A CSU campus seeking authorization to offer a doctoral degree program pursuant to this article shall submit all of the following for review by the chancellor’s office, and approval by the trustees:

(1) Documentation verifying that the proposed doctoral program does not duplicate a UC doctoral degree program that is offered or
 under review by the UC. The CSU shall, in consultation with the Academic Senate of the CSU, and the UC is requested to, in consultation with the Academic Senate of the UC, develop and agree on criteria for assessing duplication. This criteria shall include both of the following:

(A) Curricular and academic elements of the proposed doctoral program.

(B) Postgraduate professional job objectives
 for recipients of the proposed doctoral degree.

(2) Enrollment projections for the proposed doctoral program.

(3) An administrative plan for the proposed doctoral program, including, but not limited to, the funding plan for the program.

(4) Statewide workforce data relevant to the proposed doctoral program.

(b) The chancellor shall ensure all of the following for a CSU campus seeking to offer a proposed doctoral program:

(1) The chancellor notifies, in writing, and sends relevant materials on the proposed doctoral program to the president’s office and the President of the Association of
 Independent California Colleges and Universities to allow for consultation on issues of duplication. Proposed doctoral programs shall be submitted for consultation once per year pursuant to a timeline that is mutually agreed upon by the CSU and the UC.

(2) The trustees shall not approve for implementation a proposed doctoral program if the president’s office has, within 120 days of being notified and receiving materials for the proposed doctoral program pursuant to paragraph (1), provided written objections on the basis of duplication.

(3) A proposed doctoral program that receives written objections from the president’s office in compliance with paragraph (1) shall not be approved for implementation by the trustees unless and until a letter indicating a resolution of the written objections and a mutual agreement, signed by both the chancellor and the president, in support of the CSU offering the proposed doctoral program is submitted to the Assembly Committee on Higher Education and the Senate Committee on Education.

(c) (1) Doctoral degree programs that are approved for implementation by the trustees pursuant to this article may be implemented at any CSU campus.

(2) The trustees shall not approve more than 10 new doctoral degree disciplines pursuant to this article per academic year.

(3) The total number of professional or applied
 doctoral degree programs offered by a CSU campus pursuant to this article shall not, at any time, exceed 25 percent of the total number of undergraduate, graduate through the master’s degree, and professional and teacher education programs offered by the CSU campus.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 663, Sec. 1.   (AB 656)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

66046.3.

(a) The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall conduct a statewide evaluation of the doctoral degree programs authorized pursuant to this article.

(b) On or before December 31, 2028, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall submit a report, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature and the Governor on the results of the evaluation.

(c) (1) The evaluation and report shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following information on the doctoral degree programs authorized pursuant to this article:

(A) The number of CSU campuses that proposed doctoral degree
 programs.

(B) The types of doctoral degree programs proposed by CSU campuses.

(C) The number of doctoral degree programs approved by the trustees.

(D) The number of doctoral degree programs implemented.

(E) The number of doctoral degree program proposals that received objections from UC, what the objections were, and how the objections were resolved.

(F) Enrollment and completion information on implemented doctoral degree programs.

(G) The impact of expanded doctoral degrees at the CSU pursuant to this article on the accessibility, quality, and affordability of higher education in California.

(2) The report described in paragraph (1) shall include information on the impact of expanded professional doctoral education at CSU on the accessibility, quality, and affordability of higher education in California.

(d) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section shall become inoperative on December 31, 2030, and as of January 1, 2031, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 663, Sec. 1.   (AB 656)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative December 31, 2030, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Quality Undergraduate Education [66050. - 66053.]

66050.

It is the intent of the Legislature that public institutions of higher education in California shall provide a collegiate experience which gives each student the skills of communication and problem solving, the ideas and principles underlying the major areas of modern knowledge, the ability to consider ethical issues thoughtfully, the understanding that learning is a continuous lifelong process, and the knowledge of democracy necessary for good citizenship. The Legislature further intends that an undergraduate education prepare students to think critically and independently, and to have the flexibility to adapt to changing economic and social conditions, new workforce needs, and demands of a multicultural society. It is also the intent of the Legislature that the segments of higher education recognize that quality teaching is the core ingredient of the undergraduate educational experience. The segments of higher education are encouraged to improve the quality of undergraduate education as a central priority of California’s public colleges and universities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1198, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

66051.

It is the intent of the Legislature that each segmental governing board shall affirm that the oversight of teaching quality is as important a governance issue as its other management and administrative responsibilities. It is further the intent of the Legislature that governing boards shall be proactive in protecting and advancing general education within the undergraduate curriculum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1198, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

66052.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there is a need to encourage policies that enhance the quality of teaching within the segments of higher education. 

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California adopt and enforce policies and procedures which ensure that quality teaching is an essential criterion, along with research, in the evaluation of faculty for appointment, retention, promotion, and tenure. It is also the intent of the Legislature that the California State University and the governing board of each community college district adopt and enforce policies and procedures that ensure that teaching is given primacy in the evaluation of faculty for appointment, retention, promotion, and tenure. 

(c) It is further the intent of the Legislature that the governing board of each public institution of higher education ensure that teaching is an essential criterion in the review of tenured faculty members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1198, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

66053.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, and community college governing boards adopt policies and procedures to ensure that new faculty are competent in classroom teaching and that instructional resources are made available for faculty to enhance their teaching. The Legislature further encourages the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges to establish appropriate incentives for improving teaching.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1198, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Nursing Programs [66055. - 66055.9.]

66055.

Not later than September 1, 2005, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall do all of the following:

(a) Encourage community college districts to standardize all nursing program prerequisites on a statewide basis.

(b) Encourage community college districts to negotiate and implement articulation agreements with the campuses of the California State University to which they send a significant number of nursing students.

(c) Implement the recommendations of the Intersegmental Major Preparation Articulated Curriculum (IMPAC) project not later than September 1, 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1093, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

66055.5.

Not later than September 1, 2005, the Chancellor of the California State University shall do all of the following:

(a) Standardize all nursing education program prerequisites for the various campuses of the California State University on a systemwide basis.

(b) Require the campuses of the university that maintain nursing education programs to negotiate and implement articulation agreements with community college districts from which they receive a significant number of nursing students.

(c) Implement the recommendations of the Intersegmental Major Preparation Articulated Curriculum (IMPAC) project not later than September 1, 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1093, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

66055.8.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a campus of the California State University or the California Community Colleges that operates a registered nursing program shall not require a student who has been admitted to that registered nursing program and who has already earned a baccalaureate or higher degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education to undertake any coursework other than the coursework that is unique and exclusively required to earn a nursing degree from that institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 175, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

66055.9.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any college, university, or other entity that operates an accredited registered nursing program may require any prospective student to provide criminal record clearance within the meaning of Section 1265.5 of the Health and Safety Code prior to enrollment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 522, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.7. Year-Round Academic Programs [66057. - 66057.]

66057.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The future economic vitality of California will depend on the state’s ability to educate its citizens and to help them develop the work and social skills needed to compete with workers of other nations and states in our global economy.

(2) Ensuring that California’s colleges and universities can accommodate a tidal wave of new students, as well as enable those from diverse backgrounds to achieve success in their college careers, will require a variety of strategies.

(3) The Legislative Analyst’s Office (LAO) has reported that most
 campuses of the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges will soon exceed their current capacities.

(4) The LAO has identified year-round operation as a cost-efficient strategy to address future enrollment growth, by avoiding capital expenditure for instructional space, such as classrooms, class laboratories, study space in libraries, and other selected student support service facilities.

(5) Year-round operation also increases student access to high demand campuses, and allows students to accelerate their progress to degrees.

(6) (A) It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California and the California State University accommodate enrollment growth by maximizing the utilization of existing instructional facilities during
 the summer term before building new classrooms and teaching laboratories. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the University of California and the California State University make requests for capital outlay funding for space for classrooms and class laboratories justified using legislatively approved utilization standards and a reasonable assumption of summer-term enrollment. 

(B) Accordingly, the University of California is requested to base its annual five-year capital outlay plan on the utilization of instructional facilities during the summer, assuming summer-term enrollment of at least 40 percent of the average fall, winter, and spring enrollment. 

(C) The California State University is requested to base its annual five-year capital outlay plan on utilization of instructional facilities during the
 summer, assuming summer-term enrollment of at least 25 percent and 40 percent of the fall, winter, spring enrollment at rural and urban campuses, respectively. 

(b) Summer session fees at all campuses of the University of California and the California State University shall not exceed the fees charged per credit unit for any other academic term, if the state provides funding to offset any revenue losses that may occur due to the difference between the state university fee and fees charged for self-supporting academic programs.

(c) In recognition of the differing circumstances on the various campuses throughout the state, the University of California and the California State University shall retain the flexibility to implement year-round operation differently on individual campuses.

(d) On or before January 10 of each year, the University of California is requested to, and the California State University shall, submit to the Legislature a report describing summer enrollment for their respective systems. The report shall include all of the following information separately for each campus in the system: 

(1) The number of state-funded headcount students enrolled during the summer term of the preceding calendar year and, for comparison purposes, the year-average number of state-funded headcount students enrolled during the preceding fall, winter, and spring terms. 

(2) The number of state-funded full-time equivalent students enrolled during the summer term of the preceding calendar year and, for comparison purposes, the number of year-average state-funded full-time equivalent students
 enrolled during the preceding fall, winter, and spring terms. 

(3) Efforts undertaken to increase summer enrollment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 386, Sec. 7.   (AB 1182)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Campus Child Care and Development Programs [66060. - 66062.]

66060.

(a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, higher educational institutions may establish and maintain child development programs on or near their respective campuses. Those higher educational institutions under contract with the State Department of Education for child care and development services pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 are subject to the rules and regulations adopted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(b) Children of students of each campus operating a child development program shall have first priority for service in that program, in accordance with the priorities established in subdivision (b) of Section 8263.

(c) The higher educational institutions may institutionalize child development programs on their respective campuses for the purpose of incorporating child development programs into the missions and functions of the respective campuses.

(d) The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in cooperation with higher educational institutions, shall establish rules and regulations governing programs operated pursuant to this section.

(e) It is the intention of the Legislature that a consortium composed of higher educational institutions be established by the institutions to improve communication and cooperation and to advise and assist the Superintendent of Public Instruction in the development of rules and regulations and policies and procedures affecting child care and development programs. The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in cooperation with the consortium, shall be responsible for ongoing communication with and dissemination of information to all campus child care and development agencies under contract with the State Department of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

66061.

A child development program established by the California Community Colleges, the California State University, or the University of California pursuant to Section 66060 is encouraged to give priority to children of students who are single parents and who meet income criteria as established by the institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 265, Sec. 1.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

66062.

A child development center or preschool established pursuant to Section 66060 by the California Community Colleges and the California State University shall, and a child development center or preschool established pursuant to Section 66060 by the University of California is requested to, provide students with dependent children seeking childcare with both of the following:

(a) Referral to the campus Basic Needs Center established pursuant to Section 66023.4 or 66023.5 for support accessing information, including, but not limited to, information and connections to local resource and referral agencies
 in order to obtain support in applying for state and federal childcare subsidies and programs and finding local childcare providers.

(b) Referral to the campus’ financial aid office, including information on the awards for students with dependent children established pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 600, Sec. 4.   (SB 271)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Higher Education Assessment Act of 1990 [66070. - 66072.]

66070.

The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(a) The primary goal of every higher educational institution should be to provide a collegiate experience that gives each student the skills of communication and problemsolving, the ideas and principles underlying the major areas of modern knowledge, the ability to consider critical issues thoughtfully, the understanding that learning is a continuous lifelong process, and the knowledge of democracy necessary for good citizenship.

(b) To improve performance, educational institutions are encouraged to use effective assessment mechanisms based on positive reinforcement, incentives, and cooperation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 130.   Effective January 1, 2007.)